application/repository/apertium_hn_LC.dix
<pardef n="KA/__v">


<!-- verbal noun -->
<e><p><l>nA</l><r>nA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ne</l><r>nA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:o"/></r></p></e>

<!-- verbal adjective-->

<e><p><l>wA_huA</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>yA_huA</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>



<e><p><l>wA_huA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>yA_huA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>




<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>




<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>




<e><p><l>Uz</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Uz</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="acakacA"><i>acakacA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="aGA"><i>aGA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="A"><i>A</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="akulA"><i>akulA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="apanA"><i>apanA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="aXikA"><i>aXikA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="azjA"><i>azjA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bacA"><i>bacA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="BadakA"><i>BadakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bahakA"><i>bahakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bajavA"><i>bajavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="baMxA"><i>baMxA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="BannA"><i>BannA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="BaravA"><i>BaravA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="basA"><i>basA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bawalA"><i>bawalA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="baztavA"><i>baztavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="belavA"><i>belavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bicakA"><i>bicakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="BijavA"><i>BijavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="BinaBinA"><i>BinaBinA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bixakA"><i>bixakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bolavA"><i>bolavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="BugawA"><i>BugawA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bulavA"><i>bulavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bunavA"><i>bunavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="caDA"><i>caDA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="CakA"><i>CakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="CalakA"><i>CalakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="camakA"><i>camakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="catA"><i>catA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="CinavA"><i>CinavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="cuBA"><i>cuBA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="dabadabA"><i>dabadabA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="dalavA"><i>dalavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="DulavA"><i>DulavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="gaharA"><i>gaharA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="gazvA"><i>gazvA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="GulA"><i>GulA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="hadakA"><i>hadakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="haWiyA"><i>haWiyA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="iwarA"><i>iwarA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="JalamalA"><i>JalamalA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="JapadiyA"><i>JapadiyA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="juJA"><i>juJA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="JuTalA"><i>JuTalA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="KadakA"><i>KadakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="KanakA"><i>KanakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="kasavA"><i>kasavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="kicakicA"><i>kicakicA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="KisiyA"><i>KisiyA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="kulakulA"><i>kulakulA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="ladaKadA"><i>ladaKadA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="lajA"><i>lajA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="latakavA"><i>latakavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="lipatA"><i>lipatA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="macA"><i>macA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="matakA"><i>matakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="micalA"><i>micalA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="muramurA"><i>muramurA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="nakiyA"><i>nakiyA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="paCawA"><i>paCawA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="pahuzcA"><i>pahuzcA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="patA"><i>patA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="pETA"><i>pETA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="PisalA"><i>PisalA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="PusaPusA"><i>PusaPusA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="razgavA"><i>razgavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="sakapakA"><i>sakapakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="saTiyA"><i>saTiyA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="SoXavA"><i>SoXavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="suswA"><i>suswA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="tanatanA"><i>tanatanA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="TukarA"><i>TukarA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="ugalavA"><i>ugalavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="uTA"><i>uTA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="wakA"><i>wakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="WarrA"><i>WarrA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="WukA"><i>WukA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="XakaXakA"><i>XakaXakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="XaXakA"><i>XaXakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="xuKA"><i>xuKA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
